dev/gsoc2011/monodix/noun/noun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="লোক__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দেরকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="সি__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="গাভী__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="কাঠি"><i>কাঠি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘাটতি"><i>ঘাটতি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="অগ্নি"><i>অগ্নি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="টুপি"><i>টুপি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="রশ্মি"><i>রশ্মি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="গাভী"><i>গাভী</i><par n="গাভী__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="রাত্রি"><i>রাত্রি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ফুটো"><i>ফুটো</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ফেব্রুয়ারি"><i>ফেব্রুয়ারি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মেঝে"><i>মেঝে</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="একাডেমি"><i>একাডেমি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘড়ি"><i>ঘড়ি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="চুরি"><i>চুরি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="কিস্তি"><i>কিস্তি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="চাকরি"><i>চাকরি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="পদোন্নতি"><i>পদোন্নতি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="গায়ক"><i>গায়ক</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="বৃষ্টি"><i>বৃষ্টি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রগতি"><i>প্রগতি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="লিচু"><i>লিচু</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="স্মৃতি"><i>স্মৃতি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="রাশি"><i>রাশি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মোটামুটি"><i>মোটামুটি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="জীবাণু"><i>জীবাণু</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="হ্যালো"><i>হ্যালো</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বিভ্রান্তি"><i>বিভ্রান্তি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="লোক"><i>লোক</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="জনক"><i>জনক</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="অশান্তি"><i>অশান্তি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বালক"><i>বালক</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="বালি"><i>বালি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="শ্রেণী"><i>শ্রেণী</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="নায়ক"><i>নায়ক</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="সি"><i>সি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বৃত্তি"><i>বৃত্তি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="পাত্র"><i>পাত্র</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="মধু"><i>মধু</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মানব"><i>মানব</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ভিত্তি"><i>ভিত্তি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="রেণু"><i>রেণু</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মাটি"><i>মাটি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="পুত্র"><i>পুত্র</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="পুরুষ"><i>পুরুষ</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="সোসাইটি"><i>সোসাইটি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="চেহারা"><i>চেহারা</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ইনজুরি"><i>ইনজুরি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সমন্বয়কারী"><i>সমন্বয়কারী</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="পরিণতি"><i>পরিণতি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="নিষ্পত্তি"><i>নিষ্পত্তি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="কাণ্ড"><i>কাণ্ড</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মহানগরী"><i>মহানগরী</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="পুঁজি"><i>পুঁজি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ভরি"><i>ভরি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ফাঁকি"><i>ফাঁকি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মজুরি"><i>মজুরি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ভাগাভাগি"><i>ভাগাভাগি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="গণপূর্ত"><i>গণপূর্ত</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="উদ্ধৃতি"><i>উদ্ধৃতি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="তৈরী"><i>তৈরী</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="উৎপত্তি"><i>উৎপত্তি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="আন্তঃউইকি"><i>আন্তঃউইকি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="লিপি"><i>লিপি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ভুক্তি"><i>ভুক্তি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মালভূমি"><i>মালভূমি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যঞ্জনধ্বনি"><i>ব্যঞ্জনধ্বনি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="দেওয়ান"><i>দেওয়ান</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ট্রফি"><i>ট্রফি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বর্তনী"><i>বর্তনী</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="কর্তা"><i>কর্তা</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="পরিধি"><i>পরিধি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্যাটেগরি"><i>ক্যাটেগরি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মহাশয়"><i>মহাশয়</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="কাউন্টি"><i>কাউন্টি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মিস্টার"><i>মিস্টার</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="নৌবাহিনী"><i>নৌবাহিনী</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="পিতামহ"><i>পিতামহ</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="কল্পকাহিনী"><i>কল্পকাহিনী</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সাধক"><i>সাধক</i><par n="লোক__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রবেশিকা"><i>প্রবেশিকা</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="উচ্চভূমি"><i>উচ্চভূমি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ময়লা"><i>ময়লা</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সরণি"><i>সরণি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="শনি"><i>শনি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="কালি"><i>কালি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="পান্ডুলিপি"><i>পান্ডুলিপি</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বেষ্টনী"><i>বেষ্টনী</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="পদাবলী"><i>পদাবলী</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্লে"><i>ক্লে</i><par n="সি__n_nt"/></e>
